Mississippi, session 2026, HB1729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, hereinafter DPS, may sell and convey or lease, whichever is determined to be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi, the facility currently used by Mississippi Department of Public Safety for the benefit of the Highway Safety Patrol as its headquarters facility in Jackson, Mississippi, subject to the conditions authorized in this section.  The property being more particularly described as follows: A parcel of land and all the improvements located thereon, situated at 1900 East Woodrow Wilson Avenue in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, near the intersection of Interstate 55 and Woodrow Wilson Avenue, and containing 10.17 acres more or less: BEGINNING W/S HWY 51 1728.43 FT SOUTH OF LAKELAND DR; THENCE WEST 600 FT SOUTH 785.51 FT EASTERLY, NORTHEASTERLY & NORTHWESTERLY ALONG HWY TO POINT OF BEGINNING IN SOUTH 1/2 SOUTHEAST 1/4 OF SECTION 26, TOWNSHIP 6, RANGE 1 EAST. (2)  The real property and the improvements thereon described in subsection (1) of this section shall be sold or leased for private redevelopment to be used exclusively as hotel, restaurant, or both, hotel and restaurant in compliance with the provisions of this act.  As a condition of the sale or lease, the purchaser or lessee shall agree to assume all financial responsibility related to site development, which shall include the demolition of any existing structure(s) on the property for which the purchaser or lessee has no relevant use in the operation of its business activities as a hotel, restaurant or both, hotel and restaurant. (3)  (a)  If sold, the real property and the improvements thereon described in subsection (1) of this section shall be sold for not less than the current fair market value as determined by the average of at least two (2) appraisals by qualified appraisers, who shall be selected by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board.  The appraisals used in determining the current fair market value of the real property to be sold shall not have been performed more than one (1) year before the date of sale; however, if more than one (1) year elapses before the date of sale of the real property and the appraisal date referenced above, new appraisals shall be performed. (b)  (i)  If leased, the real property and the improvements thereon described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be leased for an amount less than the fair market rental value as determined by the appraiser.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall obtain at least one (1) appraisal from a competent appraiser establishing the fair market rental value of the land, exclusive of any improvements owned by the lessee. The cost of the appraisal shall be paid by the department and will be included in the cost of any lease, periodic rental adjustment or lease renewal to be reimbursed by the lessee. (ii)  Any lease executed under this act: 1.  Must contain provisions for the periodic adjustment of rentals throughout the term of the lease, which such provisions for periodic adjustment of rent shall be reasonably calculated to maintain a fair and equitable return to the state throughout the term of any lease or renewal term; and 2.  May contain any other terms and provisions, including provisions for a share of income in addition to the amount determined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) from the redeveloped property, as the department, in its discretion, deems practical and necessary to effect the intent and purposes of this act, and being in the best interest of the state. (4)  In determining the terms and conditions of the sell or lease and the proposed use of the property described in subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Finance and Administration, in preparing its advertisements for the solicitation of requests for proposals, shall take into consideration the following: (a)  Any potential interference with the operation of the University of Mississippi Medical Center or the G.V. (Sonny) Montgomery VA Medical Center; (b)  The Federal Aviation Authority's approved flight pattern for helicopters used by the University of Mississippi Medical Center's Center for Emergency Services; (c)  Zoning ordinances and restrictions as adopted by the Hinds County Board of Supervisors, which further specify the real property's location within an approved special use district within the definition of a medical complex district; and (d)  Zoning ordinances and restrictions as adopted by the Jackson City Council for governing existing land use for public and/or semi-public purposes within the incorporated municipal boundaries of the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (5)  The State of Mississippi shall retain all rights to minerals in the property transferred under subsection (1) of this section. (6)  The Department of Finance and Administration is vested with the authority to correct any discrepancies in the legal description of the property described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall advertise the availability of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety Highway Patrol Headquarters Facility and property in Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, described in Section 1 of this act for sell or lease and redevelopment. Subject to the availability of funds, the department is authorized to implement and conduct a national advertising campaign to solicit requests for proposals for the lease and redevelopment of the property. (2)  The department shall establish a deadline to receive proposals submitted by interested parties. SECTION 3.  (1) Proposals to purchase or lease and redevelop all or any part of the property described in Section 1 of this act must be considered by the Department of Finance and Administration.  A party shall submit a purchase or lease proposal on the applicable redevelopment proposal form furnished by the department, accompanied by any appendices, exhibits or other materials as the prospective purchaser or lessee desires.  Proposals shall be subject to the requirements of each of the documents required by the department on the forms developed for proposals. (2)  The department shall conduct a preproposal conference at a time, date and location deemed to be appropriate.  Persons desiring notice if the preproposal conference will be held at a time other than the originally designated time, date and location, may submit a written request to receive notice to the department.  The preproposal conference will be a forum to answer questions from potential respondents to the requests for proposals in a fair and open setting.  The department may schedule one or more additional preproposal conferences. Parties desiring notice of any additional preproposal conferences may submit a written request to receive notice to the department. (3)  Each prospective purchaser or lessee shall submit its proposal to the department no later than 5:00 p.m. on the date of the deadline established by the department.  All proposals shall be in an eight and one-half (8-1/2) inches by eleven (11) inches format, with graphics not exceeding eleven (11) inches by seventeen (17) inches.  The proposals shall be in an envelope plainly marked "Department of Public Safety Redevelopment Proposal."  All proposals must be received by the department by the deadline set for receipt of proposals. (4)  Each proposal to purchase or lease all or a portion of the property shall include: (a)  A statement indicating whether the proposal is to purchase and develop or lease and develop all or a portion of the property, and if the proposal is with respect to a portion of the property, a statement identifying the portion of the property with respect to which the proposal is made; (b)  The purchase or lease price, and/or other considerations offered for the property or applicable portion thereof, or the proposed method for determining the purchase or lease terms; and (e)  A statement evidencing the prospective purchaser or lessee's agreement that, if the department determines that it is in the best interest of the public to accept the proposal, the prospective purchaser or lessee will enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department under which, subject to satisfaction of conditions set forth in the agreement within time periods specified in the agreement, the department and the prospective purchaser or lessee will agree to enter into an agreement.  The agreement shall be in substantially the form set forth by the department, with any modifications, additions and changes that are specifically set forth in the proposal or that are mutually acceptable to the prospective purchaser or lessee and the department. (5)  In addition to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, each proposal shall also include, at a minimum, the following: (a)  A description of the development team, including, as applicable: (i)  A description of the primary respondent and related principals; (ii)  A description of team members, including architects, consultants, contractors and major sub-contractors to be used for both the redevelopment of the property described in Section 1 of this act; (iii)  A description of development and redevelopment experience of team members and status of current projects including experiences related to the design, construction, leasing and management of urban real estate projects; (iv)  A description of similar experiences of team members in developing and redeveloping properties acquired from public owners through the public process; (v)  The ability to assemble additional property to increase the magnitude and impact of the proposed project if applicable; and (vi)  A statement showing the prospective purchaser or lessee's qualifications and financial responsibility on a form approved and supplied by the department; (b)  Details of the proposed redevelopment of the property or applicable portion thereof, including information addressing, without limitation: (i)  The project vision; (ii)  A development concept including narrative description and visual depictions; (iii)  A proposed redevelopment plan; (iv)  The approximate quantities and square footage for each use; (v)  A development timeline from execution of a memorandum of understanding to completion of redevelopment; and (vi)  The preliminary project budget and fifteen-year cash-flow proforma; (c)  A comprehensive description of all conditions upon the prospective purchaser or lessee's commitment to carry out redevelopment of the property or applicable portion thereof in accordance with the proposal; and (d)  Any other information as the prospective purchaser or lessee may determine to be appropriate to permit the department to determine the qualifications, experience and abilities of the prospective purchaser or lessee and to gain a complete understanding of the prospective purchaser or lessee's vision for the property. SECTION 4.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall review and consider all proposals in light of all factors deemed relevant, including, without limiting the generality of its consideration, the following: (a)  The overall qualifications, financial stability, experience and past performance of the prospective purchaser or lessee; (b)  The experience of the prospective purchaser or lessee with respect to activities comparable to those covered by the proposal; (c)  The overall qualifications, financial stability, experience and past performance of the other members of the development team; (d)  The qualification and experience of staff to be assigned to the project; (e)  The proven ability of team members to successfully design and redevelop high quality, high-density projects in an urban setting; (f)  The legal ability of the prospective purchaser or lessee to carry out its proposal; (g)  The prospective purchaser or lessee's ability to secure or provide sufficient equity and construction and permanent financing for the proposed undertaking; (h)  The cost, scope and scale of the proposed redevelopment and the amount of the investment to be made by the prospective purchaser or lessee; (i)  The projected impact of the proposed redevelopment on the University of Mississippi Medical Center and the G.V. (Sonny) Montgomery VA Medical Center, and the likelihood that the proposed redevelopment will be a catalyst for additional development and redevelopment; (j)  The overall financial attractiveness of the proposal, and the anticipated net economic effect to the state by the department's acceptance of the proposal, including, but not limited to: (i)  The proposed purchase price, lease price or rental payments; (ii)  The projected tax revenues to be generated by and as a result of the proposed redevelopment; and (iii)  Any public assistance or incentives which the prospective purchaser or lessee intends to request; (k)  The projected timetable for the redevelopment; and (l)  Any other specific terms or conditions required or requested in the proposal. (2)  Following receipt and review of all proposals and all discussions and presentations, the department shall evaluate and rank the proposals and, unless it recommends rejection of all proposals, may enter into a redevelopment agreement with the prospective purchaser or lessee receiving the highest evaluation or ranking. (3)  The department shall select, unless it is determined to reject all proposals, one or more proposals and shall enter into negotiations with the party or parties submitting the proposal or proposals.  At that time, all prospective purchaser or lessees shall be advised of the party or parties with whom negotiations are entered.  If the department determines to negotiate with more than one (1) party, the determination as to whether the redevelopment agreement will be entered into shall be made on the basis of the factors set forth above. (4)  If the department determines not to accept any of the proposals, all prospective purchaser or lessees must be advised of that determination. (5)  The department reserves the right: (a)  To reject any and all proposals; (b)  To waive any and all informalities and irregularities; (c)  To negotiate with any person or persons for proposals; and (d)  To waive clarifications and exceptions. (6)  If the department determines that it is in the best interest of the public to accept a proposal, a notification of intent to accept the proposal shall be filed with the Secretary of State.  At that time, a copy of the notification of intent shall also be delivered to the prospective purchaser or lessee designated as the "selected prospective purchaser or lessee."  The department shall determine whether it is in the best interest of the public to accept a proposal and which proposal, if any, to accept within ninety (90) days of the submission deadline. (7)  Not less than thirty (30) days, and not more than ninety (90) days, after the date on which the notification of intent is filed, the department and the selected prospective purchaser or lessee shall enter into a memorandum of understanding setting forth the conditions to execution of a redevelopment agreement, and the time schedule for determining whether those conditions can be met. (8)  The failure of the selected prospective purchaser or lessee to execute the memorandum of understanding within the prescribed time period, or within any extension as may be granted, based upon reasons determined sufficient by the department, shall constitute a default, and the selected prospective purchaser or lessee shall have no further rights with respect to the proposal. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.